Utah statutes.
49-19-201.   Plan participation -- Eligibility.

(1)  Governors and legislators who enter office before July 1, 2011, are eligible for service credit in this plan during their term of service in their elected position.

(2)  A governor or legislator initially entering office on or after July 1, 2011:

(a)  may not participate in this system;

(b)  is only eligible to participate in the Tier II Defined Contribution Plan established under Chapter 22, Part 4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan; and

(c)  is not eligible to participate in the Tier II hybrid retirement system established under Chapter 22, Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement System.

